Utah statutes.
53A-8a-801.   Definitions.

As used in this part:

(1)  "Peer Assistance and Review Pilot Program" or "PAR Program" means the teacher evaluation and mentoring program created in Section 53A-8a-802.

(2)  "Consulting teacher" means a teacher who is appointed as described in Section 53A-8a-803 and provides assistance and review to teachers assigned to a PAR Program.

(3)  "Novice teacher" means a provisional teacher who has not achieved career employee status.

(4)  "PAR Joint Panel" means the governing panel of a district's PAR Program, created according to Section 53A-8a-804.

(5)  "Teacher" means an individual employed by a school district who is required to hold an educator license issued by the State Board of Education and who has an assignment to teach in a classroom.

(6)  "Underperforming veteran teacher" means a teacher who has achieved career employee status as defined in Section 53A-8a-102 and whose work has been judged to fall below the district's standards.



Enacted by Chapter 273, 2012 General Session

